Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-996
Contributions;
how paid; interest.

(1) The payments provided
for by sections 79-993, 79-994, and 79-997 may be made in equal installments
over a period of not to exceed two years from the date of the election to
make such payments. The payments provided for by section 79-995 may be made
in equal installments over a period of not to exceed three years from the
date of election to make such payments. Any person who elects to make payments
on an installment basis shall be credited with prior service only in six-month
increments and only after payment has been made to the retirement system to
purchase each additional six-month increment.

(2) The rate of interest
for the purchase of additional service credit pursuant to sections 79-990
and 79-991 and for determining the interest on a restored refund pursuant
to section 79-992 or on delayed payments by members to the retirement system
shall be determined by the board from time to time, and such rate of interest
shall be used to determine applicable interest for a member's purchase of
additional service credit, restored refund, or delayed payments that are made
while such rate of interest is in effect.

Laws 1987, LB 298, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 551, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1049.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 631;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 26.
April 25, 2013